Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4032.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The State Department of Energy shall evaluate sites with the potential
to serve as geographically dispersed fuel storage locations and prioritize those sites based
on factors that would make the sites attractive for storing emergency fuel reserves. Poten-
tial sites must include but need not be limited to sites that:
(a) Are situated in locations that will support population islands formed as a result of
road or bridge damage due to a seismic event;
(b) Are owned or operated by, or otherwise under the control of, the State of Oregon;
(c) Have been previously identified by a state agency with expertise related to energy, fire
or emergency management as proximate to areas with the highest risks and highest needs
in the event of a wildfire, tsunami or Cascadia Subduction Zone earthquake;
(d) Are accessible by and in proximity to priority transportation routes or, in eastern or
coastal Oregon, accessible by and in proximity to ancillary transportation routes that are
essential to communities; and
(e) Are consistent with other criteria for fuel storage sites described in the 2024 Oregon
Energy Security Plan.
(2) No later than June 15, 2027, the department shall submit the department’s prelimi-
nary findings under subsection (1) of this section to the committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to energy and emergency management in the manner provided by ORS
192.245.
(3) The department shall finalize the department’s findings under subsection (1) of this
section and include the findings in the report required under ORS 469.064 (4) due no later
than September 15, 2028. In addition to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to energy, the department shall provide the report and findings to the interim com-
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 126

A-Eng. HB 4032
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to emergency management.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended for the purpose of carrying
out section 1 of this 2026 Act.

[2]